Georgia, session 2025_26, HB45.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 4 of Chapter 12 of Title 15 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
grand juries, is amended by revising subsection (a) of Code Section 15-12-100, relating to
procedure for impaneling special grand jury, number of jurors, foreperson, and powers of
jury, as follows:
"(a) The chief judge of the superior court of any county to which this part applies, on his
or her own motion, on motion or petition of the district attorney, or on petition of any state
elected official or elected public official of the county or of a municipality lying wholly or
partially within the county, may request the judges of the superior court of the county to
impanel a special grand jury for the purpose of investigating any alleged violation of the
laws of this state or any other matter subject to investigation by grand juries as provided
by law."
H. B. 45
- 1 -

LC 48 1358
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 45
- 2 -